Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.907

Transfer of powers, duties, and functions pertaining to administrative and support services for the building code council.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of commerce pertaining to administrative and support services for the state building code council are transferred to the department of enterprise services. All references to the director or the department of commerce in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of enterprise services when referring to the functions transferred in this section. Policy and planning assistance functions performed by the department of commerce remain with the department of commerce.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of enterprise services. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of commerce in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the department of enterprise services. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department of enterprise services.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 2010, be transferred and credited to the department of enterprise services.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of enterprise services. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of enterprise services to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of enterprise services. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of enterprise services.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2010.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned to the department of enterprise services under this section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of enterprise services shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the department of enterprise services and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

[ 2015 c 225 s 93; 2010 c 271 s 308.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2010 c 271: See notes following RCW 43.330.005.